Washington statutes.
RCW 16.68.040

License required of rendering plants and independent collectors.

It is unlawful for any person to operate a rendering plant or act as an independent collector without first obtaining a license from the director.

[ 1949 c 100 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3142-4.]